Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-6,197.05
Driving under influence of alcoholic
liquor or drugs; implied consent to chemical test; revocation; effect.

Any period of revocation imposed by
the court for a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 shall
be reduced by any period of
revocation imposed under sections
60-498.01 to 60-498.04, including any period during which a person has a valid
ignition interlock permit, arising from the same incident.

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB497, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 36.